Massachusetts, session 194th, H1840.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1:  Chapter 265 of the General Laws,  is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 13D the following section:  
Section 13D1/4.  Section 13D1/4. Whoever commits an assault or an assault and battery 
in or on the property owned, leased or occupied by the Massachusetts judicial department or an 
agency or committee thereof, including any trial or appellate court,  during the time when the 
courts are in session or open to the public may be punished by imprisonment in the state prison 
for not more than three  years or by imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more 
than two and one-half years, or by a fine of not more than $25,000 or by both such fine and 
imprisonment.  

of 2 10  Section 2: Section 13C of chapter 268 of the General Laws, added  by St. 1971, c. 524, is 
hereby amended by striking our the first sentence and inserting in its place the following:--  
Whoever causes or actively participates in the willful disruption of proceedings of any 
court of the commonwealth may be punished by imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for 
not more than two and one half years or in state prison for not more than three years, or by a fine 
of not more than five thousand dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Nothing in this 
section shall interfere with or prevent the exercise by any court of the commonwealth of its 
power of contempt.  
Section 3: Section 4 of chapter 275 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking 
out the first sentence and inserting in its place the following:--  
If the person complained of is convicted, he may be punished by a fine of not more than 
one hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than six months, provided that any threat to 
cause bodily injury to a person on account of the person's performance of official duties as a 
judge, employee of the judicial department, including but not limited to clerk magistrates, 
probation officers, interpreters, stenographers, and court officers, prosecutors and attorneys may 
be punished  by imprisonment in a jail or house of correction for not more than two and one half 
years or in state prison for not more than three years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand 
dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Nothing in this section shall interfere with or 
prevent the exercise by any court of the commonwealth of its power of contempt.